District of Columbia statutes.
34-2401.07

Water main taxes and rents to be uniform.

Water main taxes and water rents shall be uniform in said District.

June 10, 1879, 21 Stat. 9, ch. 16

History

1981 Ed., § 43-1507.
1973 Ed., § 43-1505.

Prior Codifications